Alabama, session 2026rs, SB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) A driver license of a class issued
exclusively to individuals who did not exercise the option of
providing proof of lawful presence in the United States when
obtaining the license is not valid in this state and does not
authorize the holder to operate a motor vehicle in this state.
(b) A law enforcement officer who stops an individual
driving with a license as described in subsection (a) shall
issue a citation to the individual for driving without a
license pursuant to Section 32-6-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
(c) To facilitate the enforcement of this section and
to aid in providing notice to visitors and the general public
concerning invalid driver licenses, the Alabama State Law
Enforcement Agency shall do both of the following:
(1) Maintain on its website a statement summarizing
this section.
(2) Design road signage to give notice to drivers
regarding the provisions of this section.
(d) The State Department of Transportation shall
install the signage designed pursuant to subsection (c) in
each location that features a sign welcoming drivers to this
Page 2

each location that features a sign welcoming drivers to this
SB45 INTRODUCED
state.
Section 2. Section 32-6-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-2
The following persons individuals, when driving a motor
vehicle under the following conditions, are exempt from a the
requirement to obtain a driver license hereunder:
(1) Any person individual in the service of the federal
government while driving an official motor vehicle in such
service;.
(2) Any person individual while driving any road
machine, farm tractor, or implement of husbandry temporarily
driven or moved on a highway;.
(3) A nonresident who is at least 16 years of age and
who has in his or her immediate possession a valid driver's
driver license issued in his or her home state or country;.
This exemption shall not apply if the nonresident's license is
invalid pursuant to Section 1 of the act amending this
section.
(4) Any nonresident who is at least 16 years of age
whose home state or country does not require the licensing of
drivers for a period of not more than 90 days in any calendar
year, if the motor vehicle so driven is duly registered in the
home state or country of such nonresident."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3